Utah statutes.
19-6-407.   Underground storage tank registration -- Change of ownership or operation -- Civil penalty.

(1) (a)  Each owner or operator of an underground storage tank shall register the tank with the director if the tank:

(i)  is in use; or

(ii)  was closed after January 1, 1974.

(b)  If a new person assumes ownership or operational responsibilities for an underground storage tank, that person shall inform the executive secretary of the change within 30 days after the change occurs.

(c)  Each installer of an underground storage tank shall notify the director of the completed installation within 60 days following the installation of an underground storage tank.

(2)  The director may issue a notice of agency action assessing a civil penalty in the amount of $1,000 if an owner, operator, or installer, of a petroleum or underground storage tank fails to register the tank or provide notice as required in Subsection (1).

(3)  The penalties collected under authority of this section shall be deposited in the Petroleum Storage Tank Restricted Account created in Section 19-6-405.5.

